District of Columbia statutes.
47-446

Repealed

Implementation subject to appropriations.

Repealed.

July 18, 1981, D.C. Law 4-17, § 7, 28 DCR 2368
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 7008, 57 DCR 181
1981 Ed., § 47-446.
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 7008 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 7008 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).